Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 285A.657 is amended to read:
285A.657. (1) The Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority  may make grants, as funds are
available, to any port formed under ORS chapter 777 or 778 for:
(a) A planning  project conducted under ORS 285A.627 or any other planning project necessary
for improving the port’s capability to carry out  its authorized functions and activities relating to
trade and commerce; or
(b) A marketing project necessary for improving the port’s capability to carry out its  authorized
functions and activities relating to trade and commerce.
(2) Any port may file with the authority an application for a  grant from the Port Planning and
Marketing Fund to finance a specific planning project or marketing project.
(3) An application under this section shall be filed in such a manner  and contain or be accom-
panied by such information as the authority may prescribe.
(4) Upon receipt of an application, the  authority shall determine whether the planning project
or marketing project is eligible for funding under ORS 285A.654 to 285A.660.  If the authority de-
termines that the project is not eligible, it shall within 60 days:
(a) Reject the application; or
(b) Require the applicant to submit additional information as may be necessary.
(5) The authority may approve a  grant for a planning project or a marketing project described
in an application filed under this section if, after investigation, the authority finds that:
(a) The project meets the standards and criteria established by the authority for  grant financing
from the Port Planning and Marketing Fund; and
(b) Moneys in the Port Planning and Marketing Fund are or will be available for the project.
(6) Grants to ports under ORS 285A.654 to 285A.660  shall not exceed [ $50,000 and shall not ex-
ceed] the lesser of:
(a) 75 percent of the total cost of the project ; or
(b) A maximum  amount for such grants adopted by the Oregon Business Development
Department by rule .
(7) The authority shall not fund any program that subsidizes regular port operating expenses.
Enrolled House Bill 2415 (HB 2415-A) Page 1
(8) In lieu of  all or part of the grant financing approved under ORS 285A.654 to 285A.660 for a
planning or marketing project, the authority may purchase goods or services to assist a port in im-
plementing a project.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2415 (HB 2415-A) Page 2